Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.065

Formation of district—Alternative method.

If the county legislative authority desires to initiate the formation of a county road improvement district by resolution, it may elect to follow either the procedure set forth in chapter 35.43 RCW or the procedure set forth in RCW 36.88.030, and shall indicate the procedure selected in the resolution of intention.

[ 1985 c 369 s 10.]